Maryland, session 2025, SB0881.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.

SENATE BILL 881 3
(a) (2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund; [and]
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund;
206. THE BALTIMORE REGION TRANSPORTATION FUND;
207. THE CAPITAL REGION TRANSPORTATION FUND; AND
208. THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION
FUND.
Article – Tax – General
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(C–1) “BALTIMORE REGION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 10.5–101 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(D–1) “CAPITAL REGION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 10.5–201 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(T–1) “SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
10.5–301 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
2–1303.
(A) After making the distributions required under §§ 2–1301 through 2–1302.4 of
this subtitle, the Comptroller shall pay:

SENATE BILL 881
(1) revenues from the hotel surcharge into the Dorchester County
Economic Development Fund established under § 10–130 of the Economic Development
Article;
(2) FROM THE REVENUES FROM THE TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY
SURCHARGE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 11–102(C)(1) OF THIS ARTICLE THAT ARE
ATTRIBUTABLE TO RETAIL SALES IN THE BALTIMORE REGION OR USES, IN THE
BALTIMORE REGION, OF TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY, A DIGITAL CODE, A
DIGITAL PRODUCT, OR A TAXABLE SERVICE:
(I) 70% TO THE BALTIMORE REGION TRANSPORTATION FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10.5–109 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE; AND
(II) 30% TO THE COUNTIES AND MUNICIPALITIES WITHIN THE
BALTIMORE REGION DISTRIBUTED IN PROPORTION TO THE RETAIL SALES IN THE
COUNTIES AND MUNICIPALITIES OR USES, IN THE COUNTIES OR MUNICIPALITIES, OF
TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY, A DIGITAL CODE, A DIGITAL PRODUCT, OR A
TAXABLE SERVICE;
(3) FROM THE REVENUES FROM THE TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY
HOTEL SURCHARGE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 11–102(C)(2) OF THIS ARTICLE THAT
ARE ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY HOTEL SURCHARGE IN
THE BALTIMORE REGION:
(I) 70% TO THE BALTIMORE REGION TRANSPORTATION FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10.5–109 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE; AND
(II) 30% TO THE COUNTIES AND MUNICIPALITIES WITHIN THE
BALTIMORE REGION DISTRIBUTED IN PROPORTION TO THE TRANSPORTATION
AUTHORITY HOTEL SURCHARGE FROM THE COUNTIES AND MUNICIPALITIES;
(4) FROM THE REVENUES FROM THE TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY
SURCHARGE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 11–102(C)(1) OF THIS ARTICLE THAT ARE
ATTRIBUTABLE TO RETAIL SALES IN THE CAPITAL REGION OR USES, IN THE
CAPITAL REGION, OF TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY, A DIGITAL CODE, A DIGITAL
PRODUCT, OR A TAXABLE SERVICE:
(I) 70% TO THE CAPITAL REGION TRANSPORTATION FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10.5–209 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE; AND
(II) 30% TO THE COUNTIES AND MUNICIPALITIES WITHIN THE
CAPITAL REGION DISTRIBUTED IN PROPORTION TO THE RETAIL SALES IN THE
COUNTIES AND MUNICIPALITIES OR USES, IN THE COUNTIES OR MUNICIPALITIES, OF

SENATE BILL 881 5
TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY, A DIGITAL CODE, A DIGITAL PRODUCT, OR A
TAXABLE SERVICE;
(5) FROM THE REVENUES FROM THE TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY
HOTEL SURCHARGE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 11–102(C)(2) OF THIS ARTICLE THAT
ARE ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY HOTEL SURCHARGE IN
THE CAPITAL REGION:
(I) 70% TO THE CAPITAL REGION TRANSPORTATION FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10.5–209 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE; AND
(II) 30% TO THE COUNTIES AND MUNICIPALITIES WITHIN THE
CAPITAL REGION DISTRIBUTED IN PROPORTION TO THE TRANSPORTATION
AUTHORITY HOTEL SURCHARGE FROM THE COUNTIES AND MUNICIPALITIES;
(6) FROM THE REVENUES FROM THE TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY
SURCHARGE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 11–102(C)(1) OF THIS ARTICLE THAT ARE
ATTRIBUTABLE TO RETAIL SALES IN THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION OR USES,
IN THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION, OF TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY, A
DIGITAL CODE, A DIGITAL PRODUCT, OR A TAXABLE SERVICE:
(I) 70% TO THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION
TRANSPORTATION FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10.5–309 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE; AND
(II) 30% TO THE COUNTIES AND MUNICIPALITIES WITHIN THE
SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION DISTRIBUTED IN PROPORTION TO THE RETAIL
SALES IN THE COUNTIES AND MUNICIPALITIES OR USES, IN THE COUNTIES OR
MUNICIPALITIES, OF TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY, A DIGITAL CODE, A DIGITAL
PRODUCT, OR A TAXABLE SERVICE;
(7) FROM THE REVENUES FROM THE TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY
HOTEL SURCHARGE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 11–102(C)(2) OF THIS ARTICLE THAT
ARE ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY HOTEL SURCHARGE IN
THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION:
(I) 70% TO THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION
TRANSPORTATION FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10.5–309 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE; AND
(II) 30% TO THE COUNTIES AND MUNICIPALITIES WITHIN THE
SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION DISTRIBUTED IN PROPORTION TO THE

SENATE BILL 881
TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY HOTEL SURCHARGE FROM THE COUNTIES AND
MUNICIPALITIES;
[(2)] (8) to the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future Fund established under
§ 5–206 of the Education Article, the following percentage of the remaining sales and use
tax revenues:
(i) for fiscal year 2023, 9.2%;
(ii) for fiscal year 2024, 11.0%;
(iii) for fiscal year 2025, 11.3%;
(iv) for fiscal year 2026, 11.7%; and
(v) for fiscal year 2027 and each fiscal year thereafter, 12.1%; and
[(3)] (9) the remaining sales and use tax revenue into the General Fund
of the State.
(B) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY THAT RECEIVES A PAYMENT UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(2) THROUGH (7) OF THIS SECTION MAY USE THE REVENUE ONLY
FOR TRANSPORTATION PURPOSES.
11–102.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title, a tax is imposed on:
(1) a retail sale in the State; and
(2) a use, in the State, of tangible personal property, a digital code, a digital
product, or a taxable service.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, in addition to the tax
imposed under subsection (a) of this section, a hotel surcharge is imposed in Dorchester
County on the sale of a right to occupy a room or lodgings as a transient guest in an
establishment that offers at least 380 rooms.
(2) The hotel surcharge imposed under paragraph (1) of this subsection
may not be imposed if the Maryland Economic Development Corporation certifies to the
Comptroller that the bonds issued by the Maryland Economic Development Corporation
secured by the Dorchester County Economic Development Fund established under §
10–130 of the Economic Development Article have been paid in full.

SENATE BILL 881 7
(c) (1) IN ADDITION TO THE TAX IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION, A TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY SURCHARGE IS IMPOSED IN THE
BALTIMORE REGION, CAPITAL REGION, AND SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION ON:
(I) A RETAIL SALE IN THE REGION; AND
(II) A USE, IN THE REGION, OF TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY,
A DIGITAL CODE, A DIGITAL PRODUCT, OR A TAXABLE SERVICE.
(2) IN ADDITION TO THE TAX IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION AND THE SURCHARGE IMPOSED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY HOTEL SURCHARGE IS IMPOSED ON
THE SALE OF A RIGHT TO OCCUPY A ROOM OR LODGINGS AS A TRANSIENT GUEST IN
THE BALTIMORE REGION, CAPITAL REGION, AND SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION.
(D) (1) A county, municipal corporation, special taxing district, or other
political subdivision of the State may not impose any retail sales or use tax except:
(i) a sales tax or use tax that was in effect on January 1, 1971;
(ii) a tax on the sale or use of:
1. fuels;
2. utilities;
3. space rentals; or
4. any controlled dangerous substance, as defined in § 5–101
of the Criminal Law Article, unless the sale is made by a person who registers under and
complies with Title 5, Subtitle 3 of the Criminal Law Article; or
(iii) a tax imposed by a code county on the sale or use of food and
beverages authorized under § 20–602 of the Local Government Article.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection may not be construed as conferring
authority to impose a sales and use tax.
11–104.
(L) (1) THE RATE OF THE TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY SURCHARGE
IMPOSED UNDER § 11–102(C)(1) OF THIS SUBTITLE IS 0.5%.
(2) THE RATE OF THE TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY HOTEL
SURCHARGE IMPOSED UNDER § 11–102(C)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE IS 1%.

SENATE BILL 881
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
13–201.
(A) In this subtitle[, “transfer] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “BALTIMORE REGION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 10.5–101 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(C) “CAPITAL REGION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 10.5–201 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(D) “SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
10.5–301 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(E) “TRANSFER tax” means the tax imposed under this subtitle.
13–202.
(A) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a transfer tax is imposed on an
instrument of writing:
(1) recorded with the clerk of the circuit court for a county; or
(2) filed with the Department and described in § 12–103(d) of this article.
(B) IN ADDITION TO THE TRANSFER TAX IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION, A TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY TRANSFER TAX SURCHARGE IS
IMPOSED ON AN INSTRUMENT OF WRITING THAT TRANSFERS NONRESIDENTIAL
PROPERTY AND IS RECORDED WITH THE CLERK OF THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR A
COUNTY THAT IS LOCATED WITHIN THE BALTIMORE REGION, THE CAPITAL REGION,
AND THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION.
13–203.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsections (a–1) and (b) of this section, the rate
of the transfer tax is 0.5% of the consideration payable for the instrument of writing.
(2) The consideration:

SENATE BILL 881 9
(i) includes the amount of any mortgage or deed of trust assumed
by the grantee; and
(ii) subject to item (i) of this paragraph, includes only the amount
paid or delivered in return for the sale of the property and does not include the amount of
any debt forgiven or no longer secured by a mortgage or deed of trust on the property.
(C) THE RATE OF THE TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY TRANSFER TAX
SURCHARGE IMPOSED UNDER § 13–202 OF THIS SUBTITLE IS 0.15% OF THE
CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE INSTRUMENT OF WRITING TRANSFERRING
NONRESIDENTIAL PROPERTY.
13–209.
(J) (1) THE REVENUE FROM THE TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY
TRANSFER TAX SURCHARGE ON AN INSTRUMENT OF WRITING RECORDED WITH THE
CLERK OF THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR A COUNTY THAT IS LOCATED WITHIN THE
BALTIMORE REGION SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED AS FOLLOWS:
(I) 70% TO THE BALTIMORE REGION TRANSPORTATION FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10.5–109 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE; AND
(II) 1. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2
OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, 30% TO THE COUNTY WHERE THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED;
OR
2. IF THE TRANSFERRED PROPERTY IS LOCATED IN A
MUNICIPALITY, 30% TO THE MUNICIPALITY WHERE THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED.
(2) THE REVENUE FROM THE TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY
TRANSFER TAX SURCHARGE ON AN INSTRUMENT OF WRITING RECORDED WITH THE
CLERK OF THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR A COUNTY THAT IS LOCATED WITHIN THE
CAPITAL REGION SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED AS FOLLOWS:
(I) 70% TO THE CAPITAL REGION TRANSPORTATION FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10.5–209 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE; AND
(II) 1. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2
OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, 30% TO THE COUNTY WHERE THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED;
OR
2. IF THE TRANSFERRED PROPERTY IS LOCATED IN A
MUNICIPALITY, 30% TO THE MUNICIPALITY WHERE THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED.

SENATE BILL 881
(3) THE REVENUE FROM THE TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY
TRANSFER TAX SURCHARGE ON AN INSTRUMENT OF WRITING RECORDED WITH THE
CLERK OF THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR A COUNTY THAT IS LOCATED WITHIN THE
SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED AS FOLLOWS:
(I) 70% TO THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION
TRANSPORTATION FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10.5–309 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE; AND
(II) 1. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2
OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, 30% TO THE COUNTY WHERE THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED;
OR
2. IF THE TRANSFERRED PROPERTY IS LOCATED IN A
MUNICIPALITY, 30% TO THE MUNICIPALITY WHERE THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED.
(4) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY THAT RECEIVES A DISTRIBUTION
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY USE THE REVENUE ONLY FOR TRANSPORTATION
PURPOSES.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Transportation
TITLE 10.5. REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITIES.
SUBTITLE 1. BALTIMORE REGION TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY.
10.5–101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “AUTHORITY” MEANS THE BALTIMORE REGION TRANSPORTATION
AUTHORITY.
(C) “BALTIMORE REGION” MEANS ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY, BALTIMORE
COUNTY, BALTIMORE CITY, AND HOWARD COUNTY.
(D) “TRANSPORTATION FACILITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–101 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
10.5–102.

SENATE BILL 881 11
(A) THERE IS A BALTIMORE REGION TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY.
(B) THE AUTHORITY IS A BODY POLITIC AND CORPORATE AND IS AN
INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE STATE.
(C) THE EXERCISE BY THE AUTHORITY OF A POWER UNDER THIS SUBTITLE
IS THE PERFORMANCE OF AN ESSENTIAL GOVERNMENTAL FUNCTION.
10.5–103.
THE PURPOSE OF THE AUTHORITY IS TO PREPARE AND IMPLEMENT
INVESTMENTS IN TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS THAT MAXIMIZE THE MOVEMENT OF
PEOPLE AND PROMOTE EFFICIENCY, SAFETY, AND OTHER VALUES SUCH AS
ENVIRONMENTAL AND SOCIAL JUSTICE IMPACTS.
10.5–104.
(A) THE AUTHORITY CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(1) THE MAYOR OF BALTIMORE CITY, OR THE MAYOR’S DESIGNEE;
(2) THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE OF ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY, OR THE
COUNTY EXECUTIVE’S DESIGNEE;
(3) THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE OF BALTIMORE COUNTY, OR THE
COUNTY EXECUTIVE’S DESIGNEE;
(4) THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE OF HOWARD COUNTY, OR THE COUNTY
EXECUTIVE’S DESIGNEE;
(5) ONE ELECTED OFFICIAL FROM EACH MUNICIPALITY WITHIN THE
BALTIMORE REGION, APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE MUNICIPALITY;
(6) ONE MEMBER OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND WHO RESIDES
WITHIN THE BALTIMORE REGION, APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(7) TWO MEMBERS OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES WHO RESIDE
WITHIN THE BALTIMORE REGION, APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
AND

SENATE BILL 881
(8) TWO MEMBERS WITH EXPERIENCE IN TRANSPORTATION
PLANNING, FINANCE, ENGINEERING, CONSTRUCTION, OR MANAGEMENT,
APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR.
(B) THE SECRETARY SHALL SERVE AS A NONVOTING, EX OFFICIO MEMBER.
(C) (1) THE TERM OF A MEMBER IS 4 YEARS.
(2) AT THE END OF A TERM, A MEMBER CONTINUES TO SERVE UNTIL
A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND QUALIFIES.
(D) FROM AMONG ITS MEMBERS, THE AUTHORITY SHALL ELECT A CHAIR
AND A VICE CHAIR.
(E) THE AUTHORITY SHALL ADOPT RULES AND REGULATIONS NECESSARY
FOR THE CONDUCT OF ITS AFFAIRS.
10.5–105.
(A) (1) THE AUTHORITY SHALL EMPLOY AN EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR TO
SERVE AS THE CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER OF THE AUTHORITY.
(2) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL SERVE AT THE PLEASURE OF
THE AUTHORITY.
(B) THE AUTHORITY MAY EMPLOY OR RETAIN OFFICERS, STAFF, AND
AGENTS, INCLUDING ENGINEERING, ARCHITECTURAL, FISCAL, AND CONSTRUCTION
EXPERTS AND ATTORNEYS, AND SET THEIR COMPENSATION.
10.5–106.
(A) THE AUTHORITY MAY:
(1) ADOPT BYLAWS FOR THE CONDUCT OF ITS BUSINESS;
(2) ADOPT A SEAL;
(3) MAINTAIN OFFICES AT A PLACE IT DESIGNATES IN THE STATE;
(4) ACCEPT LOANS, GRANTS, OR ASSISTANCE OF ANY KIND FROM THE
FEDERAL OR STATE GOVERNMENT, A LOCAL GOVERNMENT, A COLLEGE OR
UNIVERSITY, OR A PRIVATE SOURCE;

SENATE BILL 881 13
(5) ENTER INTO CONTRACTS AND OTHER LEGAL INSTRUMENTS;
(6) SUE OR BE SUED;
(7) ACQUIRE, PURCHASE, HOLD, LEASE AS LESSEE, AND USE:
(I) A FRANCHISE, PATENT, OR LICENSE;
(II) STOCK OR OTHER FORMS OF OWNERSHIP INTERESTS IN
CORPORATIONS, LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANIES, PARTNERSHIPS, OR OTHER
ENTITIES, WHETHER OPERATED FOR PROFIT OR NOT FOR PROFIT;
(III) ANY REAL, PERSONAL, MIXED, TANGIBLE, OR INTANGIBLE
PROPERTY; OR
(IV) AN INTEREST IN A PROPERTY LISTED UNDER ITEMS (I)
THROUGH (III) OF THIS ITEM;
(8) SELL, LEASE AS LESSOR, TRANSFER, LICENSE, ASSIGN, OR
DISPOSE OF PROPERTY OR A PROPERTY INTEREST THAT IT ACQUIRES;
(9) FIX AND COLLECT RATES, RENTALS, FEES, ROYALTIES, AND
CHARGES FOR SERVICES AND RESOURCES IT PROVIDES OR MAKES AVAILABLE;
(10) CREATE, OWN, CONTROL, OR BE A MEMBER OF A CORPORATION,
LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY, PARTNERSHIP, OR OTHER ENTITY, WHETHER
OPERATED FOR PROFIT OR NOT FOR PROFIT;
(11) EXERCISE POWER USUALLY POSSESSED BY A PRIVATE
CORPORATION IN PERFORMING SIMILAR FUNCTIONS UNLESS TO DO SO WOULD
CONFLICT WITH STATE LAW; AND
(12) DO ALL THINGS NECESSARY OR CONVENIENT TO CARRY OUT THE
POWERS GRANTED BY THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE AUTHORITY MAY DELEGATE ANY POWER OR DUTY IT CONSIDERS
APPROPRIATE TO A MEMBER, AN OFFICER, AN AGENT, OR AN EMPLOYEE OF THE
AUTHORITY.
10.5–107.

SENATE BILL 881
(A) (1) THE AUTHORITY SHALL PREPARE A REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION
PLAN FOR THE BALTIMORE REGION THAT INCLUDES TRANSPORTATION
IMPROVEMENTS OF REGIONAL SIGNIFICANCE.
(2) THE AUTHORITY MAY REVISE THE REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION
PLAN.
(B) AFTER THE ADOPTION OF A REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION PLAN, THE
AUTHORITY MAY CONSTRUCT OR ACQUIRE, BY PURCHASE, LEASE, CONTRACT, OR
OTHERWISE, THE TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES SPECIFIED IN THE REGIONAL
TRANSPORTATION PLAN.
10.5–108.
(A) THE AUTHORITY SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING DUTIES AND
RESPONSIBILITIES:
(1) GENERAL OVERSIGHT OF REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAMS;
(2) LONG–RANGE REGIONAL PLANNING FOR THE BALTIMORE
REGION, BOTH FISCALLY CONSTRAINED AND UNCONSTRAINED;
(3) RECOMMENDING TO STATE, REGIONAL, AND FEDERAL AGENCIES
REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION PRIORITIES, INCLUDING PUBLIC–PRIVATE
TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS, AND FUNDING ALLOCATIONS;
(4) ALLOCATING TO PRIORITY REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION
PROJECTS ANY FUNDS MADE AVAILABLE TO THE AUTHORITY AND, AT THE
DISCRETION OF THE AUTHORITY, DIRECTLY OVERSEEING THE PROJECTS;
(5) RECOMMENDING TO THE DEPARTMENT PRIORITY REGIONAL
TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS FOR RECEIPT OF FEDERAL AND STATE FUNDS;
(6) RECOMMENDING TO THE DEPARTMENT USE OR CHANGES IN USE
OF TOLLS OR CHARGES FOR FACILITIES IN THE BALTIMORE REGION;
(7) GENERAL OVERSIGHT OF REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION ISSUES OF
A MULTIJURISDICTIONAL NATURE, INCLUDING INTELLIGENT TRANSPORTATION
SYSTEMS, SIGNALIZATION, AND PREPARATION FOR AND RESPONSE TO
EMERGENCIES;

SENATE BILL 881 15
(8) SERVING AS AN ADVOCATE FOR THE TRANSPORTATION NEEDS OF
THE BALTIMORE REGION BEFORE THE STATE AND FEDERAL GOVERNMENTS; AND
(9) APPLYING TO AND NEGOTIATING WITH THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT AND THE STATE FOR GRANTS AND ANY OTHER FUNDS AVAILABLE TO
CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE AUTHORITY SHALL CONSULT WITH THE DEPARTMENT,
METROPOLITAN PLANNING ORGANIZATIONS, AND OTHER STAKEHOLDERS IN
RECOMMENDING OR PRIORITIZING ANY TRANSPORTATION PROJECT.
10.5–109.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE BALTIMORE REGION
TRANSPORTATION FUND.
(B) THERE IS A BALTIMORE REGION TRANSPORTATION FUND.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO FINANCE TRANSPORTATION
FACILITIES IN THE BALTIMORE REGION.
(D) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE AUTHORITY SHALL ADMINISTER
THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(2) INTEREST EARNINGS;
(3) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 2–1303 OF THE
TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(4) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 13–209 OF THE
TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE; AND

SENATE BILL 881
(5) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR THE FINANCING OF
TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES IN THE BALTIMORE REGION.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(J) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR FINANCING TRANSPORTATION
FACILITIES IN THE BALTIMORE REGION IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND IS NOT
INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD BE
APPROPRIATED FOR TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES IN THE BALTIMORE REGION.
10.5–110.
ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, AND EACH JANUARY 1 THEREAFTER, THE
AUTHORITY SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE ACTIVITIES OF THE
AUTHORITY DURING THE PRIOR YEAR.
SUBTITLE 2. CAPITAL REGION TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY.
10.5–201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “AUTHORITY” MEANS THE CAPITAL REGION TRANSPORTATION
AUTHORITY.
(C) “CAPITAL REGION” MEANS FREDERICK COUNTY, MONTGOMERY
COUNTY, AND PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(D) “TRANSPORTATION FACILITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–101 OF
THIS ARTICLE.

SENATE BILL 881 17
10.5–202.
(A) THERE IS A CAPITAL REGION TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY.
(B) THE AUTHORITY IS A BODY POLITIC AND CORPORATE AND IS AN
INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE STATE.
(C) THE EXERCISE BY THE AUTHORITY OF A POWER UNDER THIS SUBTITLE
IS THE PERFORMANCE OF AN ESSENTIAL GOVERNMENTAL FUNCTION.
10.5–203.
THE PURPOSE OF THE AUTHORITY IS TO PREPARE AND IMPLEMENT
INVESTMENTS IN TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS THAT MAXIMIZE THE MOVEMENT OF
PEOPLE AND PROMOTE EFFICIENCY, SAFETY, AND OTHER VALUES SUCH AS
ENVIRONMENTAL AND SOCIAL JUSTICE IMPACTS.
10.5–204.
(A) THE AUTHORITY CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(1) THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE OF FREDERICK COUNTY, OR THE
COUNTY EXECUTIVE’S DESIGNEE;
(2) THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE OF MONTGOMERY COUNTY, OR THE
COUNTY EXECUTIVE’S DESIGNEE;
(3) THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE OF PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY, OR THE
COUNTY EXECUTIVE’S DESIGNEE;
(4) ONE MEMBER OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND WHO RESIDES
WITHIN THE CAPITAL REGION, APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(5) TWO MEMBERS OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES WHO RESIDE
WITHIN THE CAPITAL REGION, APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
(6) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MUNICIPALITIES IN FREDERICK
COUNTY, DESIGNATED BY THE MUNICIPALITIES IN FREDERICK COUNTY;
(7) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MUNICIPALITIES IN
MONTGOMERY COUNTY, DESIGNATED BY THE MUNICIPALITIES IN MONTGOMERY
COUNTY;

SENATE BILL 881
(8) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MUNICIPALITIES IN PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY, DESIGNATED BY THE MUNICIPALITIES IN PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY; AND
(9) TWO MEMBERS WITH EXPERIENCE IN TRANSPORTATION
PLANNING, FINANCE, ENGINEERING, CONSTRUCTION, OR MANAGEMENT,
APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR.
(B) THE SECRETARY SHALL SERVE AS A NONVOTING, EX OFFICIO MEMBER.
(C) (1) THE TERM OF A MEMBER IS 4 YEARS.
(2) AT THE END OF A TERM, A MEMBER CONTINUES TO SERVE UNTIL
A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND QUALIFIES.
(D) FROM AMONG ITS MEMBERS, THE AUTHORITY SHALL ELECT A CHAIR
AND A VICE CHAIR.
(E) THE AUTHORITY SHALL ADOPT RULES AND REGULATIONS NECESSARY
FOR THE CONDUCT OF ITS AFFAIRS.
10.5–205.
(A) (1) THE AUTHORITY SHALL EMPLOY AN EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR TO
SERVE AS THE CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER OF THE AUTHORITY.
(2) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL SERVE AT THE PLEASURE OF
THE AUTHORITY.
(B) THE AUTHORITY MAY EMPLOY OR RETAIN OFFICERS, STAFF, AND
AGENTS, INCLUDING ENGINEERING, ARCHITECTURAL, FISCAL, AND CONSTRUCTION
EXPERTS AND ATTORNEYS, AND SET THEIR COMPENSATION.
10.5–206.
(A) THE AUTHORITY MAY:
(1) ADOPT BYLAWS FOR THE CONDUCT OF ITS BUSINESS;
(2) ADOPT A SEAL;
(3) MAINTAIN OFFICES AT A PLACE IT DESIGNATES IN THE STATE;

SENATE BILL 881 19
(4) ACCEPT LOANS, GRANTS, OR ASSISTANCE OF ANY KIND FROM THE
FEDERAL OR STATE GOVERNMENT, A LOCAL GOVERNMENT, A COLLEGE OR
UNIVERSITY, OR A PRIVATE SOURCE;
(5) ENTER INTO CONTRACTS AND OTHER LEGAL INSTRUMENTS;
(6) SUE OR BE SUED;
(7) ACQUIRE, PURCHASE, HOLD, LEASE AS LESSEE, AND USE:
(I) A FRANCHISE, PATENT, OR LICENSE;
(II) STOCK OR OTHER FORMS OF OWNERSHIP INTERESTS IN
CORPORATIONS, LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANIES, PARTNERSHIPS, OR OTHER
ENTITIES, WHETHER OPERATED FOR PROFIT OR NOT FOR PROFIT;
(III) ANY REAL, PERSONAL, MIXED, TANGIBLE, OR INTANGIBLE
PROPERTY; OR
(IV) AN INTEREST IN A PROPERTY LISTED UNDER ITEMS (I)
THROUGH (III) OF THIS ITEM;
(8) SELL, LEASE AS LESSOR, TRANSFER, LICENSE, ASSIGN, OR
DISPOSE OF PROPERTY OR A PROPERTY INTEREST THAT IT ACQUIRES;
(9) FIX AND COLLECT RATES, RENTALS, FEES, ROYALTIES, AND
CHARGES FOR SERVICES AND RESOURCES IT PROVIDES OR MAKES AVAILABLE;
(10) CREATE, OWN, CONTROL, OR BE A MEMBER OF A CORPORATION,
LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY, PARTNERSHIP, OR OTHER ENTITY, WHETHER
OPERATED FOR PROFIT OR NOT FOR PROFIT;
(11) EXERCISE POWER USUALLY POSSESSED BY A PRIVATE
CORPORATION IN PERFORMING SIMILAR FUNCTIONS UNLESS TO DO SO WOULD
CONFLICT WITH STATE LAW; AND
(12) DO ALL THINGS NECESSARY OR CONVENIENT TO CARRY OUT THE
POWERS GRANTED BY THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE AUTHORITY MAY DELEGATE ANY POWER OR DUTY IT CONSIDERS
APPROPRIATE TO A MEMBER, AN OFFICER, AN AGENT, OR AN EMPLOYEE OF THE
AUTHORITY.

SENATE BILL 881
10.5–207.
(A) (1) THE AUTHORITY SHALL PREPARE A REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION
PLAN FOR THE CAPITAL REGION THAT INCLUDES TRANSPORTATION
IMPROVEMENTS OF REGIONAL SIGNIFICANCE.
(2) THE AUTHORITY MAY REVISE THE REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION
PLAN.
(B) AFTER THE ADOPTION OF A REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION PLAN, THE
AUTHORITY MAY CONSTRUCT OR ACQUIRE, BY PURCHASE, LEASE, CONTRACT, OR
OTHERWISE, THE TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES SPECIFIED IN THE REGIONAL
TRANSPORTATION PLAN.
10.5–208.
(A) THE AUTHORITY SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING DUTIES AND
RESPONSIBILITIES:
(1) GENERAL OVERSIGHT OF REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAMS;
(2) LONG–RANGE REGIONAL PLANNING FOR THE CAPITAL REGION,
BOTH FISCALLY CONSTRAINED AND UNCONSTRAINED;
(3) RECOMMENDING TO STATE, REGIONAL, AND FEDERAL AGENCIES
REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION PRIORITIES, INCLUDING PUBLIC–PRIVATE
TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS, AND FUNDING ALLOCATIONS;
(4) ALLOCATING TO PRIORITY REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION
PROJECTS ANY FUNDS MADE AVAILABLE TO THE AUTHORITY AND, AT THE
DISCRETION OF THE AUTHORITY, DIRECTLY OVERSEEING THE PROJECTS;
(5) RECOMMENDING TO THE DEPARTMENT PRIORITY REGIONAL
TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS FOR RECEIPT OF FEDERAL AND STATE FUNDS;
(6) RECOMMENDING TO THE DEPARTMENT USE OR CHANGES IN USE
OF TOLLS OR CHARGES FOR FACILITIES IN THE CAPITAL REGION;
(7) GENERAL OVERSIGHT OF REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION ISSUES OF
A MULTIJURISDICTIONAL NATURE, INCLUDING INTELLIGENT TRANSPORTATION
SYSTEMS, SIGNALIZATION, AND PREPARATION FOR AND RESPONSE TO
EMERGENCIES;

SENATE BILL 881 21
(8) SERVING AS AN ADVOCATE FOR THE TRANSPORTATION NEEDS OF
THE CAPITAL REGION BEFORE THE STATE AND FEDERAL GOVERNMENTS; AND
(9) APPLYING TO AND NEGOTIATING WITH THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT AND THE STATE FOR GRANTS AND ANY OTHER FUNDS AVAILABLE TO
CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE AUTHORITY SHALL CONSULT WITH THE DEPARTMENT,
METROPOLITAN PLANNING ORGANIZATIONS, AND OTHER STAKEHOLDERS IN
RECOMMENDING OR PRIORITIZING ANY TRANSPORTATION PROJECT.
10.5–209.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE CAPITAL REGION
TRANSPORTATION FUND.
(B) THERE IS A CAPITAL REGION TRANSPORTATION FUND.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO FINANCE TRANSPORTATION
FACILITIES IN THE CAPITAL REGION.
(D) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE AUTHORITY SHALL ADMINISTER
THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(2) INTEREST EARNINGS;
(3) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 2–1303 OF THE
TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(4) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 13–209 OF THE
TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE; AND

SENATE BILL 881
(5) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR THE FINANCING OF
TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES IN THE CAPITAL REGION.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(J) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR FINANCING TRANSPORTATION
FACILITIES IN THE CAPITAL REGION IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND IS NOT INTENDED
TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD BE APPROPRIATED FOR
TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES IN THE CAPITAL REGION.
10.5–210.
ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, AND EACH JANUARY 1 THEREAFTER, THE
AUTHORITY SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE ACTIVITIES OF THE
AUTHORITY DURING THE PRIOR YEAR.
SUBTITLE 3. SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY.
10.5–301.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “AUTHORITY” MEANS THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION
TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY.
(C) “SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION” MEANS CALVERT COUNTY, CHARLES
COUNTY, AND ST. MARY’S COUNTY.
(D) “TRANSPORTATION FACILITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–101 OF
THIS ARTICLE.

SENATE BILL 881 23
10.5–302.
(A) THERE IS A SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION TRANSPORTATION
AUTHORITY.
(B) THE AUTHORITY IS A BODY POLITIC AND CORPORATE AND IS AN
INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE STATE.
(C) THE EXERCISE BY THE AUTHORITY OF A POWER UNDER THIS SUBTITLE
IS THE PERFORMANCE OF AN ESSENTIAL GOVERNMENTAL FUNCTION.
10.5–303.
THE PURPOSE OF THE AUTHORITY IS TO PREPARE AND IMPLEMENT
INVESTMENTS IN TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS THAT MAXIMIZE THE MOVEMENT OF
PEOPLE AND PROMOTE EFFICIENCY, SAFETY, AND OTHER VALUES SUCH AS
ENVIRONMENTAL AND SOCIAL JUSTICE IMPACTS.
10.5–304.
(A) THE AUTHORITY CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(1) ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNING BODY OF CALVERT
COUNTY;
(2) ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNING BODY OF CHARLES
COUNTY;
(3) ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNING BODY OF ST.
MARY’S COUNTY;
(4) ONE ELECTED OFFICIAL FROM EACH MUNICIPALITY WITHIN THE
SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION, APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE
MUNICIPALITY;
(5) ONE MEMBER OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND WHO RESIDES
WITHIN THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION, APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF
THE SENATE;
(6) TWO MEMBERS OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES WHO RESIDE
WITHIN THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION, APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE
HOUSE; AND

SENATE BILL 881
(7) TWO MEMBERS WITH EXPERIENCE IN TRANSPORTATION
PLANNING, FINANCE, ENGINEERING, CONSTRUCTION, OR MANAGEMENT,
APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR.
(B) THE SECRETARY SHALL SERVE AS A NONVOTING, EX OFFICIO MEMBER.
(C) (1) THE TERM OF A MEMBER IS 4 YEARS.
(2) AT THE END OF A TERM, A MEMBER CONTINUES TO SERVE UNTIL
A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND QUALIFIES.
(D) FROM AMONG ITS MEMBERS, THE AUTHORITY SHALL ELECT A CHAIR
AND A VICE CHAIR.
(E) THE AUTHORITY SHALL ADOPT RULES AND REGULATIONS NECESSARY
FOR THE CONDUCT OF ITS AFFAIRS.
10.5–305.
(A) (1) THE AUTHORITY SHALL EMPLOY AN EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR TO
SERVE AS THE CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER OF THE AUTHORITY.
(2) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL SERVE AT THE PLEASURE OF
THE AUTHORITY.
(B) THE AUTHORITY MAY EMPLOY OR RETAIN OFFICERS, STAFF, AND
AGENTS, INCLUDING ENGINEERING, ARCHITECTURAL, FISCAL, AND CONSTRUCTION
EXPERTS AND ATTORNEYS, AND SET THEIR COMPENSATION.
10.5–306.
(A) THE AUTHORITY MAY:
(1) ADOPT BYLAWS FOR THE CONDUCT OF ITS BUSINESS;
(2) ADOPT A SEAL;
(3) MAINTAIN OFFICES AT A PLACE IT DESIGNATES IN THE STATE;
(4) ACCEPT LOANS, GRANTS, OR ASSISTANCE OF ANY KIND FROM THE
FEDERAL OR STATE GOVERNMENT, A LOCAL GOVERNMENT, A COLLEGE OR
UNIVERSITY, OR A PRIVATE SOURCE;

SENATE BILL 881 25
(5) ENTER INTO CONTRACTS AND OTHER LEGAL INSTRUMENTS;
(6) SUE OR BE SUED;
(7) ACQUIRE, PURCHASE, HOLD, LEASE AS LESSEE, AND USE:
(I) A FRANCHISE, PATENT, OR LICENSE;
(II) STOCK OR OTHER FORMS OF OWNERSHIP INTERESTS IN
CORPORATIONS, LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANIES, PARTNERSHIPS, OR OTHER
ENTITIES, WHETHER OPERATED FOR PROFIT OR NOT FOR PROFIT;
(III) ANY REAL, PERSONAL, MIXED, TANGIBLE, OR INTANGIBLE
PROPERTY; OR
(IV) AN INTEREST IN A PROPERTY LISTED UNDER ITEMS (I)
THROUGH (III) OF THIS ITEM;
(8) SELL, LEASE AS LESSOR, TRANSFER, LICENSE, ASSIGN, OR
DISPOSE OF PROPERTY OR A PROPERTY INTEREST THAT IT ACQUIRES;
(9) FIX AND COLLECT RATES, RENTALS, FEES, ROYALTIES, AND
CHARGES FOR SERVICES AND RESOURCES IT PROVIDES OR MAKES AVAILABLE;
(10) CREATE, OWN, CONTROL, OR BE A MEMBER OF A CORPORATION,
LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY, PARTNERSHIP, OR OTHER ENTITY, WHETHER
OPERATED FOR PROFIT OR NOT FOR PROFIT;
(11) EXERCISE POWER USUALLY POSSESSED BY A PRIVATE
CORPORATION IN PERFORMING SIMILAR FUNCTIONS UNLESS TO DO SO WOULD
CONFLICT WITH STATE LAW; AND
(12) DO ALL THINGS NECESSARY OR CONVENIENT TO CARRY OUT THE
POWERS GRANTED BY THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE AUTHORITY MAY DELEGATE ANY POWER OR DUTY IT CONSIDERS
APPROPRIATE TO A MEMBER, AN OFFICER, AN AGENT, OR AN EMPLOYEE OF THE
AUTHORITY.
10.5–307.

SENATE BILL 881
(A) (1) THE AUTHORITY SHALL PREPARE A REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION
PLAN FOR THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION THAT INCLUDES TRANSPORTATION
IMPROVEMENTS OF REGIONAL SIGNIFICANCE.
(2) THE AUTHORITY MAY REVISE THE REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION
PLAN.
(B) AFTER THE ADOPTION OF A REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION PLAN, THE
AUTHORITY MAY CONSTRUCT OR ACQUIRE, BY PURCHASE, LEASE, CONTRACT, OR
OTHERWISE, THE TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES SPECIFIED IN THE REGIONAL
TRANSPORTATION PLAN.
10.5–308.
(A) THE AUTHORITY SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING DUTIES AND
RESPONSIBILITIES:
(1) GENERAL OVERSIGHT OF REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAMS;
(2) LONG–RANGE REGIONAL PLANNING FOR THE SOUTHERN
MARYLAND REGION, BOTH FISCALLY CONSTRAINED AND UNCONSTRAINED;
(3) RECOMMENDING TO STATE, REGIONAL, AND FEDERAL AGENCIES
REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION PRIORITIES, INCLUDING PUBLIC–PRIVATE
TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS, AND FUNDING ALLOCATIONS;
(4) ALLOCATING TO PRIORITY REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION
PROJECTS ANY FUNDS MADE AVAILABLE TO THE AUTHORITY AND, AT THE
DISCRETION OF THE AUTHORITY, DIRECTLY OVERSEEING THE PROJECTS;
(5) RECOMMENDING TO THE DEPARTMENT PRIORITY REGIONAL
TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS FOR RECEIPT OF FEDERAL AND STATE FUNDS;
(6) RECOMMENDING TO THE DEPARTMENT USE OR CHANGES IN USE
OF TOLLS OR CHARGES FOR FACILITIES IN THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION;
(7) GENERAL OVERSIGHT OF REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION ISSUES OF
A MULTIJURISDICTIONAL NATURE, INCLUDING INTELLIGENT TRANSPORTATION
SYSTEMS, SIGNALIZATION, AND PREPARATION FOR AND RESPONSE TO
EMERGENCIES;

SENATE BILL 881 27
(8) SERVING AS AN ADVOCATE FOR THE TRANSPORTATION NEEDS OF
THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION BEFORE THE STATE AND FEDERAL
GOVERNMENTS; AND
(9) APPLYING TO AND NEGOTIATING WITH THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT AND THE STATE FOR GRANTS AND ANY OTHER FUNDS AVAILABLE TO
CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE AUTHORITY SHALL CONSULT WITH THE DEPARTMENT,
METROPOLITAN PLANNING ORGANIZATIONS, AND OTHER STAKEHOLDERS IN
RECOMMENDING OR PRIORITIZING ANY TRANSPORTATION PROJECT.
10.5–309.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION
TRANSPORTATION FUND.
(B) THERE IS A SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION TRANSPORTATION FUND.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO FINANCE TRANSPORTATION
FACILITIES IN THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION.
(D) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE AUTHORITY SHALL ADMINISTER
THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(2) INTEREST EARNINGS;
(3) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 2–1303 OF THE
TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(4) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 13–209 OF THE
TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE; AND

SENATE BILL 881
(5) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR THE FINANCING OF
TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES IN THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(J) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR FINANCING TRANSPORTATION
FACILITIES IN THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND IS
NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD BE
APPROPRIATED FOR TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES IN THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND
REGION.
10.5–310.
ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, AND EACH JANUARY 1 THEREAFTER, THE
AUTHORITY SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE ACTIVITIES OF THE
AUTHORITY DURING THE PRIOR YEAR.
SUBTITLE 4. FINANCING OF TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS.
10.5–401.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “AUTHORITY” MEANS:
(1) THE BALTIMORE REGION TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10.5–102 OF THIS TITLE;
(2) THE CAPITAL REGION TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10.5–202 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(3) THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION TRANSPORTATION
AUTHORITY ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10.5–302 OF THIS TITLE.

SENATE BILL 881 29
10.5–402.
(A) TO FINANCE THE COST OF TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES AND
PROJECTS, AN AUTHORITY MAY ISSUE BONDS, NOTES, OR OTHER EVIDENCE OF
OBLIGATION, PAYABLE SOLELY FROM THE REVENUES DISTRIBUTED TO THE
AUTHORITY.
(B) BOND PROCEEDS MAY BE USED SOLELY FOR PAYING THE COST OF
TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES AND PROJECTS.
10.5–403.
(A) BONDS ISSUED BY AN AUTHORITY UNDER THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT:
(1) CONSTITUTE A DEBT OF THE STATE OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION
OF THE STATE OTHER THAN THE AUTHORITY, AND SHALL SO STATE ON THEIR FACE;
(2) CONSTITUTE A PLEDGE OF THE FULL FAITH AND CREDIT OF THE
STATE OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE; OR
(3) DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY OBLIGATE THE STATE OR A POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE TO IMPOSE ANY TAX, AND SHALL CONTAIN A
STATEMENT ON THEIR FACE TO THAT EFFECT.
(B) AN AUTHORITY SHALL DETERMINE THE FOLLOWING CONCERNING
BONDS ISSUED BY THE AUTHORITY:
(1) DATE OF ISSUE;
(2) INTEREST RATE;
(3) DATE AND AMOUNT OF MATURITY, EXCEPT THAT A BOND MAY NOT
MATURE MORE THAN 40 YEARS AFTER ITS DATE OF ISSUE;
(4) FORM AND MANNER OF EXECUTION;
(5) MANNER OF SALE; AND
(6) ANY OTHER MATTER RELATING TO THE FORM, TERMS,
CONDITIONS, ISSUANCE, SALE, AND DELIVERY OF THE BONDS.
(C) AN AUTHORITY MAY ISSUE BONDS:

SENATE BILL 881
(1) WITHOUT OBTAINING THE CONSENT OF ANY INSTRUMENTALITY,
AGENCY, OR UNIT OF THE STATE; AND
(2) WITHOUT ANY PROCEEDINGS OR THE OCCURRENCE OF ANY
CONDITIONS OR OBLIGATIONS OTHER THAN THOSE SPECIFICALLY REQUIRED BY
THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) (1) BONDS SHALL BE EXECUTED ON BEHALF OF AN AUTHORITY BY
THE MANUAL OR FACSIMILE SIGNATURES OF THE INDIVIDUALS DESIGNATED BY THE
GOVERNING BODY OF THE AUTHORITY.
(2) OTHER SIGNATURES ON THE BONDS MAY BE EITHER MANUAL OR
FACSIMILE.
(E) IF AN INDIVIDUAL WHOSE MANUAL OR FACSIMILE SIGNATURE APPEARS
ON ANY BOND OR COUPON CEASES TO SERVE IN AN AUTHORIZED CAPACITY BEFORE
THE DELIVERY OF THE BOND, THE SIGNATURE NEVERTHELESS IS AS VALID AND
SUFFICIENT FOR ALL PURPOSES AS IF THE INDIVIDUAL HAD REMAINED IN THAT
CAPACITY UNTIL DELIVERY OF THE BOND.
10.5–404.
(A) WITHOUT THE APPROVAL OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, AN AUTHORITY
MAY ISSUE BONDS TO REFINANCE ALL OR ANY PART OF THE COST OF
TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES OR PROJECTS FOR WHICH THE AUTHORITY
PREVIOUSLY ISSUED BONDS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) IF, BY REASON OF INCREASED CONSTRUCTION COSTS, ERROR IN
ESTIMATES, OR OTHERWISE, THE PROCEEDS OF THE BONDS OF ANY ISSUE ARE LESS
THAN THE AMOUNT REQUIRED FOR THE PURPOSE FOR WHICH THE BONDS ARE
AUTHORIZED, ADDITIONAL BONDS MAY BE ISSUED IN A SIMILAR MANNER TO
PROVIDE THE AMOUNT OF THE DEFICIENCY.
10.5–405.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “REFUNDING” MEANS THE RETIREMENT AND
CANCELLATION OF BONDS, INCLUDING BONDS OF PRIOR ISSUES, AFTER THEIR
ACQUISITION BY OR FOR AN AUTHORITY, WHETHER BEFORE, AT, OR AFTER
MATURITY, EITHER IN EXCHANGE FOR OTHER BONDS OR BY PAYMENT, PURCHASE,
OR REDEMPTION WITH THE PROCEEDS OF THE SALE OF OTHER BONDS.
(B) AN AUTHORITY MAY ISSUE REFUNDING BONDS FOR:

SENATE BILL 881 31
(1) REFUNDING ANY BONDS ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE OR ANY
BONDS OF PRIOR ISSUES, INCLUDING THE PAYMENT OF ANY REDEMPTION PREMIUM
ON THE BONDS AND ANY INTEREST ACCRUED OR TO ACCRUE TO THE DATE OF
REDEMPTION OF THE BONDS; AND
(2) CONSTRUCTING IMPROVEMENTS OR EXTENSIONS TO OR
ENLARGEMENTS OF ANY TRANSPORTATION FACILITY OR PROJECT.
10.5–406.
BEFORE THE PREPARATION OF DEFINITIVE BONDS, AN AUTHORITY MAY
ISSUE INTERIM CERTIFICATES OR TEMPORARY BONDS, WITH OR WITHOUT
COUPONS, EXCHANGEABLE FOR DEFINITIVE BONDS WHEN THE DEFINITIVE BONDS
HAVE BEEN EXECUTED AND ARE AVAILABLE FOR DELIVERY.
10.5–407.
(A) AN AUTHORITY MAY ISSUE BOND ANTICIPATION NOTES PAYABLE TO
THE BEARER OR REGISTERED HOLDER OF THE NOTES OUT OF THE FIRST PROCEEDS
OF THE NEXT SALE OF BONDS ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE ISSUANCE OF BOND ANTICIPATION NOTES, THE DETAILS OF THEIR
ISSUANCE, THE RIGHTS OF THEIR HOLDERS, AND THE RIGHTS, DUTIES, AND
OBLIGATIONS OF THE AUTHORITY WITH RESPECT TO THE BOND ANTICIPATION
NOTES ARE GOVERNED BY THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE RELATING TO THE
ISSUANCE OF THE BONDS IN ANTICIPATION OF THE SALE AT WHICH THE NOTES ARE
ISSUED, INSOFAR AS THOSE PROVISIONS ARE APPLICABLE.
10.5–408.
(A) BONDS ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE SECURED BY A TRUST
AGREEMENT BETWEEN AN AUTHORITY AND A CORPORATE TRUSTEE, WHICH MAY BE
ANY TRUST COMPANY OR BANK HAVING TRUST POWERS WITHIN OR OUTSIDE THE
STATE.
(B) THE TRUST AGREEMENT MAY PLEDGE OR ASSIGN ALL OR ANY PART OF
THE REVENUES OF AN AUTHORITY OR OF ANY TRANSPORTATION FACILITY OR
PROJECT.
10.5–409.
THE REVENUE DESIGNATED AS SECURITY FOR BONDS ISSUED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE SHALL BE FIXED AND ADJUSTED SO AS TO PROVIDE FUNDS THAT ARE
SUFFICIENT AS LONG AS THE BONDS ARE OUTSTANDING AND UNPAID TO PAY THE

SENATE BILL 881
PRINCIPAL OF AND THE INTEREST ON THE BONDS AS THEY BECOME DUE AND
PAYABLE.
10.5–410.
ALL MONEY THAT IS RECEIVED BY AN AUTHORITY AS PROCEEDS FROM THE
SALE OF BONDS, NOTES, OR OTHER EVIDENCES OF OBLIGATION UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE AND, BY WAY OF RENTALS, RATES, FEES, FARES, AND TAXES, THAT IS
DESIGNATED BY ANY TRUST AGREEMENT AS SECURITY FOR THE BONDS, NOTES, OR
OTHER EVIDENCES OF OBLIGATION SHALL BE DEEMED TO BE TRUST FUNDS TO BE
HELD AND APPLIED ONLY AS PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE.
10.5–411.
EXCEPT TO THE EXTENT RESTRICTED BY THE TRUST AGREEMENT, THE
TRUSTEE OR ANY HOLDER OF BONDS ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE OR OF ANY OF
THE COUPONS APPERTAINING TO THE BONDS MAY:
(1) BRING A SUIT OR ANY OTHER PROCEEDING TO PROTECT AND
ENFORCE ANY RIGHT UNDER THE LAWS OF THE STATE OR UNDER THE TRUST
AGREEMENT; AND
(2) ENFORCE AND COMPEL THE PERFORMANCE OF ALL DUTIES
REQUIRED BY THIS SUBTITLE OR BY THE TRUST AGREEMENT TO BE PERFORMED BY
AN AUTHORITY OR BY ANY OF ITS OFFICERS.
10.5–412.
BONDS ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE ARE SECURITIES:
(1) IN WHICH ALL PUBLIC OFFICERS AND PUBLIC BODIES OF THE
STATE AND ITS POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS, ALL INSURANCE COMPANIES, STATE
BANKS AND TRUST COMPANIES, NATIONAL BANKING ASSOCIATIONS, SAVINGS
BANKS, SAVINGS AND LOAN ASSOCIATIONS, INVESTMENT COMPANIES, EXECUTORS,
ADMINISTRATORS, TRUSTEES, AND OTHER FIDUCIARIES MAY PROPERLY AND
LEGALLY INVEST FUNDS, INCLUDING CAPITAL IN THEIR CONTROL OR BELONGING
TO THEM; AND
(2) THAT MAY BE PROPERLY AND LEGALLY DEPOSITED WITH AND
RECEIVED BY ANY STATE OR COUNTY OFFICER OR ANY AGENCY OR POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE FOR ANY PURPOSE FOR WHICH THE DEPOSIT OF BONDS
OR OBLIGATIONS OF THE STATE IS AUTHORIZED BY LAW.
10.5–413.

SENATE BILL 881 33
THE BONDS, NOTES, AND OTHER EVIDENCES OF OBLIGATION ISSUED UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE, THEIR TRANSFER, THE INTEREST PAYABLE ON THEM, AND ANY
INCOME DERIVED FROM THEM, INCLUDING ANY PROFIT REALIZED IN THEIR SALE
OR EXCHANGE, SHALL BE EXEMPT FROM TAXATION BY THE STATE OR BY ANY OF ITS
POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS, MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS, OR PUBLIC AGENCIES.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall be
applicable to all instruments of writing recorded or filed on or after October 1, 2025.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.